Maryland, session 2026, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1204*

HOUSE BILL 1204
TITLE 9.12. EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT PROGRAM.
9.12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ACCOUNT” MEANS AN EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT OPENED WITH A
PRIVATE FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT FIRM OR SIMILAR ENTITY THAT IS QUALIFIED BY
THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) “ELIGIBLE STUDENT” MEANS A STUDENT WHO:
(I) IS ELIGIBLE TO ENROLL IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE;
AND
(II) ATTENDED A PUBLIC SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, OR HOME
SCHOOL IN THE STATE FOR NOT LESS THAN 100 DAYS DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(2) “ELIGIBLE STUDENT” INCLUDES A STUDENT OF AN ACTIVE DUTY
MILITARY MEMBER STATIONED IN THE STATE, REGARDLESS OF THE ATTENDANCE
REQUIREMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) “PARENT” MEANS A LEGAL RESIDENT OF THE STATE WHO IS A PARENT,
A GUARDIAN, A CUSTODIAN, OR ANY OTHER PERSON WITH AUTHORITY TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT.
(E) “PRIVATE TUTORING” MEANS TUTORING SERVICES PROVIDED BY A
TUTOR WHO:
(1) IS A TEACHER LICENSED IN ANY STATE;
(2) IS A SUBJECT MATTER EXPERT; OR
(3) IS OTHERWISE APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(G) (1) “QUALIFYING SCHOOL” MEANS ANY NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT
PROVIDES INSTRUCTION TO PRIMARY OR SECONDARY STUDENTS AND HAS NOTIFIED

HOUSE BILL 1204 3
THE DEPARTMENT OF ITS INTENTION TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AND
COMPLY WITH THE PROGRAM’S REQUIREMENTS.
(2) “QUALIFYING SCHOOL” DOES NOT INCLUDE A HOME SCHOOL.
(H) “RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT” MEANS THE SCHOOL SYSTEM IN THE
COUNTY IN WHICH THE STUDENT RESIDES.
9.12–102.
(A) (1) THERE IS AN EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT PROGRAM IN THE
STATE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE STATE GRANTS TO THE
ACCOUNT OF THE PARENT OF AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT TO PROVIDE FOR THE
EDUCATION OF THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT.
(C) A PARENT OF AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT SHALL BE QUALIFIED FOR A STATE
GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM IF THE PARENT SIGNS AN AGREEMENT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT AGREEING:
(1) TO PROVIDE AN EDUCATION FOR THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT IN, AT A
MINIMUM, READING, GRAMMAR, SOCIAL STUDIES, AND SCIENCE THAT CONFORMS
TO EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT’S GRADE LEVEL AS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) TO ENROLL THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT IN AN EDUCATION PROGRAM
THAT MEETS REGULAR SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS;
(3) TO ENSURE THAT THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT WILL TAKE ALL
ASSESSMENTS REQUIRED UNDER STATE LAW;
(4) TO RELEASE THE RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT FROM ALL
OBLIGATIONS TO EDUCATE THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT;
(5) TO NOT ENROLL THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR
PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL EXCEPT FOR CONTRACTED SERVICES UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION;
(6) TO USE ALL FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER THIS TITLE EXCLUSIVELY
FOR THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT’S EDUCATION EXPENSES UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF

HOUSE BILL 1204
THIS SECTION IN KINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12;
(7) TO NOT TRANSFER ANY FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER THIS TITLE TO A
BENEFICIARY THAT IS NOT THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT OR THE PARENT OF THE
ELIGIBLE STUDENT, OR OTHERWISE TAKE POSSESSION OF FUNDS TO WHICH THE
ELIGIBLE STUDENT OR PARENT OF THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT IS NOT ENTITLED;
(8) TO NOT RECEIVE ANY OTHER PUBLIC SUBSIDY FOR THE
EDUCATION OF THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT UNLESS ANY FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER THE
PROGRAM ARE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT OF THE SUBSIDY;
(9) TO NOT BILL AN INSURANCE COMPANY, MEDICAID, OR ANY
OTHER AGENCY FOR THE SAME SERVICES FOR WHICH FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER THIS
TITLE ARE USED; AND
(10) TO RETURN ANY UNUSED FUNDS TO THE STATE:
(I) WHEN THE STUDENT ACHIEVES A HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA
OR ITS EQUIVALENT; OR
(II) ON THE STUDENT’S REMOVAL FROM A QUALIFYING SCHOOL
IN THE STATE.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON A
QUARTERLY BASIS THE STATE SHALL DEPOSIT INTO AN ACCOUNT OF AN ELIGIBLE
STUDENT AN AMOUNT EQUIVALENT TO:
(I) FOR STUDENTS FROM FAMILIES WHOSE INCOME IS LESS
THAN OR EQUAL TO 500% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, 75% OF THE PER PUPIL AMOUNT OF STATE AND
LOCAL FUNDS FOR EACH EDUCATION PROGRAM IN THE RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT
FOR WHICH THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT WOULD BE INCLUDED IN THE ENROLLMENT
COUNT FOR THE CALCULATIONS UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) FOR STUDENTS FROM FAMILIES WHOSE INCOME IS
GREATER THAN 500% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, 50% OF THE PER PUPIL AMOUNT OF STATE AND
LOCAL FUNDS FOR EACH EDUCATION PROGRAM IN THE RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT
FOR WHICH THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT WOULD BE INCLUDED IN THE ENROLLMENT
COUNT FOR THE CALCULATIONS UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE ELIGIBLE STUDENT SHALL BE COUNTED IN THE
ENROLLMENT COUNT USED FOR PURPOSES OF CALCULATING THE STATE AND

HOUSE BILL 1204 5
LOCAL FUNDING FOR THE EDUCATION PROGRAMS UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 2 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(II) THE COUNTY SHALL REIMBURSE THE STATE FOR THE
LOCAL FUNDING REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE THAT IS
PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE AMOUNT DEPOSITED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEDUCTED FROM THE AMOUNT OF STATE AND LOCAL FUNDS
PROVIDED TO THE RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 2 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(4) A PARENT OF AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT MAY DEPOSIT ADDITIONAL
FUNDS TO AN ACCOUNT ON A PRE–TAX BASIS AS PROVIDED UNDER § 10–208(DD) OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) THE FUNDS IN AN ACCOUNT MAY BE USED ONLY FOR EDUCATION
EXPENSES UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION AND AS APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(E) PARENTS OF AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT MAY USE THE FUNDS IN THE
ACCOUNT ONLY FOR THE FOLLOWING EXPENSES:
(1) TUITION AND FEES AT A QUALIFYING SCHOOL;
(2) TEXTBOOKS OR UNIFORMS REQUIRED BY A QUALIFYING SCHOOL;
(3) PAYMENT FOR PRIVATE TUTORING;
(4) PAYMENT FOR PURCHASE OF CURRICULAR MATERIALS, ANY
SUPPLEMENTAL MATERIALS REQUIRED FOR THE CURRICULUM, AND
INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS;
(5) TUITION OR FEES FOR A NONPUBLIC ONLINE LEARNING
PROGRAM;
(6) FEES FOR NATIONAL NORM–REFERENCED EXAMINATIONS,
ADVANCED PLACEMENT EXAMINATIONS OR SIMILAR COURSES, ANY EXAMINATIONS
RELATED TO POSTSECONDARY ADMISSION, AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION COURSES;
(7) EDUCATION SERVICES FROM A LICENSED OR ACCREDITED
PROVIDER FOR ELIGIBLE STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES OR WITH SPECIAL NEEDS;

HOUSE BILL 1204
(8) CONTRACTED EDUCATION SERVICES PROVIDED AT A PUBLIC
SCHOOL OR WITHIN A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(9) IF APPLICABLE:
(I) INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER FEES; OR
(II) ONLINE LEARNING FEES; AND
(10) ANY OTHER EDUCATION EXPENSES APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(F) A QUALIFYING SCHOOL, A PRIVATE TUTORING PROVIDER, OR ANY
OTHER EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY NOT REFUND, REBATE, OR SHARE THE GRANT
PROVIDED UNDER THIS TITLE WITH A PARENT OR AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO PARENTS ON:
(1) THE ELIGIBLE USES OF ACCOUNT FUNDS;
(2) THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE PARENT; AND
(3) THE DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT.
9.12–103.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL QUALIFY PRIVATE FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT FIRMS OR SIMILAR ENTITIES TO MANAGE ACCOUNTS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH REASONABLE FEES BASED
ON MARKET RATES.
(B) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONDUCT OR CONTRACT FOR THE
AUDITING OF ACCOUNTS.
(II) AT A MINIMUM, A RANDOM SAMPLING OF ACCOUNTS SHALL
BE AUDITED ANNUALLY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DETERMINE A PARENT INELIGIBLE FOR
THE PROGRAM IF SUBSTANTIAL MISUSE OF ACCOUNT FUNDS OCCURS.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REFER ANY SUBSTANTIAL MISUSE OF
ACCOUNT FUNDS TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR FURTHER INVESTIGATION.

HOUSE BILL 1204 7
9.12–104.
(A) A QUALIFYING SCHOOL SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE HEALTH AND SAFETY LAWS OR
CODES;
(2) HOLD A VALID OCCUPANCY PERMIT IF REQUIRED;
(3) CERTIFY COMPLIANCE WITH NONDISCRIMINATION POLICIES
UNDER TITLE 42 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE;
(4) CONDUCT CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS ON EMPLOYEES;
(5) REFUSE TO EMPLOY INDIVIDUALS WHO:
(I) ARE INELIGIBLE FOR EMPLOYMENT UNDER STATE LAW; OR
(II) POSE A THREAT TO THE SAFETY OF STUDENTS;
(6) OFFER ALL APPROPRIATE STANDARDIZED ASSESSMENTS;
(7) HAVE NO RECORD OF FRAUD OR ABUSE;
(8) ON REQUEST, PROVIDE PARENTS OF PROSPECTIVE STUDENTS
DETAILS ABOUT THE SCHOOL’S PROGRAMS, QUALIFICATIONS, EXPERIENCE, AND
CAPACITY TO SERVE STUDENTS; AND
(9) BE EITHER:
(I) AN APPROVED NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; OR
(II) A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL WITH PROVISIONAL APPROVAL.
(B) TO ENSURE APPROPRIATE EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS, A QUALIFYING
SCHOOL SHALL PROVIDE PARENTS WITH A RECEIPT FOR ALL QUALIFYING
EXPENDITURES.
9.12–105.
THE RESIDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL PROVIDE A QUALIFYING SCHOOL OR
PROVIDER THAT HAS ADMITTED AN ELIGIBLE STUDENT WITH A COMPLETE COPY OF

HOUSE BILL 1204
THE STUDENT’S SCHOOL RECORD IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE FEDERAL FAMILY
EDUCATIONAL RIGHTS AND PRIVACY ACT.
9.12–106.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
(DD) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “ACCOUNT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.12–101 OF
THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(III) “PARENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.12–101 OF THE
EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(IV) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE EDUCATION SAVINGS ACCOUNT
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 9.12 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES THE AMOUNT DEPOSITED INTO AN ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER THE
PROGRAM BY A PARENT DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.